fts/tsearch_data/english.affix
altstringchar	&Egrave;	\xC8	# иИ Latin letter E with grave
altstringchar	&eacute;	\xE9
altstringchar	&Eacute;	\xC9	# йЙ Latin letter E with acute
altstringchar	&ecirc;		\xEA
altstringchar	&Ecirc;		\xCA	# кК Latin letter E with circumflex
altstringchar	&euml;		\xEB
altstringchar	&Euml;		\xCB	# лЛ Latin letter E with diaeresis
altstringchar	&igrave;	\xEC
altstringchar	&Igrave;	\xCC	# мМ Latin letter I with grave
altstringchar	&iacute;	\xED
altstringchar	&Iacute;	\xCD	# нН Latin letter I with acute
altstringchar	&icirc;		\xEE
altstringchar	&Icirc;		\xCE	# оО Latin letter I with circumflex
altstringchar	&iuml;		\xEF
altstringchar	&Iuml;		\xCF	# пП Latin letter I with diaeresis
altstringchar	&eth;		\xF0
altstringchar	&ETH;		\xD0	# рР Latin letter eth
altstringchar	&ntilde;	\xF1
altstringchar	&Ntilde;	\xD1	# сС Latin letter N with tilde
altstringchar	&ograve;	\xF2
altstringchar	&Ograve;	\xD2	# тТ Latin letter O with grave
altstringchar	&oacute;	\xF3
altstringchar	&Oacute;	\xD3	# уУ Latin letter O with acute
altstringchar	&ocirc;		\xF4
altstringchar	&Ocirc;		\xD4	# фФ Latin letter O with circumflex
altstringchar	&otilde;	\xF5
altstringchar	&Otilde;	\xD5	# хХ Latin letter O with tilde
altstringchar	&ouml;		\xF6
altstringchar	&Ouml;		\xD6	# цЦ Latin letter O with diaeresis
altstringchar	&oslash;	\xF8
altstringchar	&Oslash;	\xD8	# шШ Latin letter O with stroke
altstringchar	&szlig;		\xDF	# Я Latin small letter sharp s
altstringchar	&ugrave;	\xF9
altstringchar	&Ugrave;	\xD9	# щЩ Latin letter U with grave
altstringchar	&uacute;	\xFA
altstringchar	&Uacute;	\xDA	# ъЪ Latin letter U with acute
altstringchar	&ucirc;		\xFB
altstringchar	&Ucirc;		\xDB	# ыЫ Latin letter U with circumflex
altstringchar	&uuml;		\xFC
altstringchar	&Uuml;		\xDC	# ьЬ Latin letter U with diaeresis
altstringchar	&yacute;	\xFD
altstringchar	&Yacute;	\xDD	# эЭ Latin letter Y with acute
altstringchar	&yuml;		\xFF	# я Latin small letter Y with diaeresis
altstringchar	&thorn;		\xFE
altstringchar	&THORN;		\xDE	# юЮ Latin letter thorn

# Here's a record of flags used, in case you want to add new ones.
# Right now, we fit within the minimal MASKBITS definition.
#
#            ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ
# Used:      *  *  ****  ** * ***** ***
#            A  D  GHIJ  MN P RSTUV XYZ
# Available:  -- --    --  - -     -
#             BC EF    KL  O Q     W

# Now the prefix table.  There are only three prefixes that are truly
# frequent in English, and none of them seem to need conditional variations.
#
prefixes

flag *A:
    .		>	RE		# As in enter > reenter

flag *I:
    .		>	IN		# As in disposed > indisposed

flag *U:
    .		>	UN		# As in natural > unnatural

# Finally, the suffixes.  These are exactly the suffixes that came out
# with the original "ispell";  I haven't tried to improve them.  The only
# thing I did besides translate them was to add selected cross-product flags.
#
suffixes

flag V:
    E		>	-E,IVE		# As in create > creative
    [^E]	>	IVE		# As in prevent > preventive

flag *N:
    E		>	-E,ION		# As in create > creation
    Y		>	-Y,ICATION	# As in multiply > multiplication
    [^EY]	>	EN		# As in fall > fallen

flag *X:
    E		>	-E,IONS		# As in create > creations
    Y		>	-Y,ICATIONS	# As in multiply > multiplications
    [^EY]	>	ENS		# As in weak > weakens

flag H:
    Y		>	-Y,IETH		# As in twenty > twentieth
    [^Y]	>	TH		# As in hundred > hundredth

flag *Y:
    .		>	LY		# As in quick > quickly

flag *G:
    E		>	-E,ING		# As in file > filing
    [^E]	>	ING		# As in cross > crossing

flag *J:
    E		>	-E,INGS		# As in file > filings
    [^E]	>	INGS		# As in cross > crossings

flag *D:
    E		>	D		# As in create > created
    [^AEIOU]Y	>	-Y,IED		# As in imply > implied
    [^EY]	>	ED		# As in cross > crossed
    [AEIOU]Y	>	ED		# As in convey > conveyed

flag T:
    E		>	ST		# As in late > latest
    [^AEIOU]Y	>	-Y,IEST		# As in dirty > dirtiest
    [AEIOU]Y	>	EST		# As in gray > grayest
    [^EY]	>	EST		# As in small > smallest

flag *R:
    E		>	R		# As in skate > skater
    [^AEIOU]Y	>	-Y,IER		# As in multiply > multiplier
    [AEIOU]Y	>	ER		# As in convey > conveyer
    [^EY]	>	ER		# As in build > builder

flag *Z:
    E		>	RS		# As in skate > skaters
    [^AEIOU]Y	>	-Y,IERS		# As in multiply > multipliers
    [AEIOU]Y	>	ERS		# As in convey > conveyers
    [^EY]	>	ERS		# As in build > builders

flag *S:
    [^AEIOU]Y	>	-Y,IES		# As in imply > implies
    [AEIOU]Y	>	S		# As in convey > conveys
    [SXZH]	>	ES		# As in fix > fixes
    [^SXZHY]	>	S		# As in bat > bats

flag *P:
    [^AEIOU]Y	>	-Y,INESS	# As in cloudy > cloudiness
    [AEIOU]Y	>	NESS		# As in gray > grayness
    [^Y]	>	NESS		# As in late > lateness

flag *M:
    .		>	'S		# As in dog > dog's
