fts/tsearch_data/english.dict
accrete/NVX
activation/AI
adopt/DGRSVZ
adventurous/PY
advertency/AIU
advertent/IY
affinity/MS
affricate/DNSV
affrighted/UY
affronte/DGRV
aggravate/DGNSVX
airstrip/MS
alliterate/DGNSVX
alt/RZ
ameliorate/DGNV
Americanize/R
amphibious/PY
analyzing/AU
anemometrical/Y
ankle/MS
ant/DGMS
applicable/IPU
apposite/NPVY
appreciate/DGNSVX
appreciated/U
apprehend/DGRS
arise/GJRS
arm/DGMRSZ
arresting/Y
asperse/DNRVX
assess/ADGS
assessment/AMS
assignee/MS
attain/DGRSZ
attitudinize/R
augmentable/U
augural/I
awe/DGT
awkward/PY
ax/DGRSZ
axe/DGNRSXZ
babish/DPY
badge/DGRSZ
Bangladesh/M
baptist/MS
batt/DGNRXZ
bay/DGPSY
be/DGHNRSTY
bee/GHJRSTZ
beep/DGRS
beest/J
belled/A
benignity/U
besiege/DGRZ
bible/MS
bind/DGJRSZ
blancmange/R
blare/DGS
bless/DGJRS
blight/DGR
blockheadish/P
blunt/DGPRSTY
bo/H
bone/DGRSZ
braid/DGRS
brakemen/M
branch/DGJRS
brand/DGRS
breakpoint/DGMS
brittle/DGPRTY
broken/PUY
brought/U
budget/DGRSZ
bush/DGJRS
bushi/PRY
busy/DGPRST
cadaverous/PY
calcitrate/A
calibrate/DGNRSX
campus/MS
cancellate/DNX
capacitation/I
carbonize/DGRSZ
careen/DGR
caress/DGRSV
cause/DGRS
caution/DGJRSZ
celluloid/D
cementation/A
centillion/H
cerebrate/DGNSX
chamfered/U
changeover/MS
chart/DGJRSZ
cheap/GNPRTXY
chemist/MS
circle/DGRS
circumcise/DGNRSX
circumlocute/NX
civilized/PU
cline/AI
clock/DGJRSZ
close/DGJPRSTYZ
closefisted/PY
coded/AU
coerced/U
color/DGJMRSZ
combinate/NVX
combust/V
come/GHJRSTYZ
commended/AU
commonweal/H
communicably/IU
compact/DGPRSTYZ
compare/DGRS
compartmentalize/DGS
compass/DGRSV
complicate/DGNSVX
compressibility/I
concept/MSV
concurrent/PY
condite/ANX
confided/U
conform/DGRSZ
conglomerate/DNSVX
connectedness/IU
consideration/AI
constellate/NX
continuative/PY
contradict/DGRSV
controllably/IU
convention/MRS
convicted/U
cool/DGHJNPRSTYZ
coordinate/DGNPSVXY
cord/ADGRS
correlate/DGNSVX
corrode/DGRS
corruptibility/IU
costume/DGRSZ
coyish/P
creationist/A
crenate/DNY
crosse/DGJRSZ
crud/RT
crystallize/DGRSZ
cultist/S
cumberment/I
curry/DGRS
curse/DGRSV
customary/PU
cut/MRST
dad/MS
dale/HMRS
damage/DGRSZ
deamidate/N
deave/Y
deciduous/PY
declinate/NX
defensibly/I
deft/PRTY
degenerate/DGNPSVY
dehydrate/DGNS
deify/NR
delete/DGNRSVX
denunciate/DGNSVX
dependable/IU
deplete/DGNSVX
deploys/A
deplumate/DN
describe/DGRSZ
destructible/IU
determinant/MS
determinate/NPVXY
devise/DGJNRSX
dick/RSXZ
dietitian/MS
digest/DGRSV
dimple/DGS
directive/MPSY
discern/DGRS
discernible/IPU
discomfited/U
discordant/PY
disinflate/N
dissolute/NPVXY
distinct/IPUVY
distribute/ADGNRSVX
div/DGRTZ
dive/DGRSTZ
divulgence/A
doggone/DG
dolphin/MS
dope/DGRSZ
doubtably/AU
doubtless/PY
dovetail/DR
dozen/HRS
dubiously/I
dusty/PRT
dwell/DGJRSZ
e/DMRSZ
efficience/I
electoral/Y
electrocardiogram/MS
electrocute/DGNSX
eleven/HRS
elude/DGRS
emasculate/DGNSV
emendable/IU
endnote/MS
engaged/PY
engineer/DGJMS
enumerate/DGNSVX
equivalve/IU
erected/U
escalop/D
estrange/DGRS
evaluate/DGNSVX
evaluated/AU
evil/PRSTY
examine/DGRSZ
excess/SV
excrete/DGNRSVX
execution/RS
exigible/I
expostulate/GNV
expressibly/IU
expressive/IPUY
exsiccate/NV
extravaganza/S
extricable/IU
fading/PUY
family/MS
fast/DGNPRSTX
fasten/DGJRSZ
fe/DTV
fend/RZ
fightable/U
find/GJRSZ
fir/DGHJRZ
fissile/IU
flail/DGS
flash/DGPRSYZ
flax/N
flurry/DGS
forestation/A
foretaste/R
forewarn/DGJRS
forfeit/DGRSZ
formality/IU
formate/DGNSVX
former/PSY
fou/H
fra/I
framework/MS
frank/DGPRSTY
fresco/DGRS
froward/PY
fuse/DGNSX
g/DGMNRTVXZ
gar/H
garn/RZ
generalize/DGRSZ
generated/AU
gest/DN
girt/U
goodbye/MS
goodhearted/PY
grabble/GR
grad/DGJRSZ
grassy/PRT
gratified/Y
green/DGHPRSTY
grippe/DGRZ
group/DGJMRS
growths/I
gynecological/MS
hard/GJNPRSTXY
harp/DGJRSZ
harped/U
hatless/P
hazy/PRT
headphone/MS
hear/GHJRSTZ
hedge/DGRS
hobble/DGRS
hovering/Y
humanify/N
humor/DGMRSZ
hungry/PRT
hyperconscious/P
icon/MS
ideographic/U
ill/HPS
illapse/V
imbursement/A
imitability/I
impasse/NSVX
inappropriable/P
incapsulate/N
incrassate/DNV
inexhaustive/Y
infinity/HS
infrigidate/NV
infuse/DGNRSVX
inhibit/DGRSV
initialed/U
inkle/GJ
innocent/PSY
innovate/DGNSVX
instantiate/DGNSX
insurance/MS
inter/AT
interdict/V
intruse/NVX
invent/DGRSV
ionize/DGJNRSXZ
Italianate/NY
ivory/DMPS
jay/MS
jelly/DGMS
joinable/U
jurat/V
ka/H
kindled/AU
lagoon/MS
laminate/DGNSX
lamp/GMRSZ
landlock/D
large/PRTY
lash/DGJRS
lavender/DG
li/DHNRSXY
lift/DGRSZ
ligurite/N
linking/AU
located/AU
lock/DGJRSZ
log/MS
loophole/DGMS
loose/DGPRSTY
loquacious/PY
lubricate/DGNSVX
lukewarm/HPY
magnificent/PY
mandarin/MS
manufacture/DGRSZ
masculate/N
mate/DGJMRSY
maximize/DGRSZ
meditate/DGNSVX
meetable/U
messy/PRT
microfilm/DMRS
migrate/DGNSVX
milk/DGNPRSZ
milline/RZ
minify/DGNS
mir/DGH
misapprehensive/PY
mobilizes/A
moist/NPY
moo/DGHS
move/DGJRSZ
mu/H
mummify/DNX
muscled/U
mustache/DS
nationalize/DGRSZ
native/PSY
nea/H
nice/PRTY
nominated/AU
nondisjunct/V
nongraduate/DN
nonofficial/Y
nor/H
note/DGNRSX
novelette/R
numerable/IP
O'Leary/M
oblate/NPXY
obligate/DGNSVXY
optate/NV
ordinate/DGNSVXY
originate/DGNSVX
overcopious/PY
overfierce/P
overhaul/DGJRS
overplace/D
oxidable/IU
oxygenate/DGNSX
pa/HSY
pale/DGPRSTY
passe/DGNRSVXZ
passing/PY
patchwork/RZ
patency/A
patented/U
patronize/DGJRSZ
peep/DGRSZ
perforate/DGNSVX
perpetrate/DGNSX
petabit/MS
photograph/DGRZ
phrase/DGJRS
picked/PY
Platonical/PY
played/AU
porter/GSY
pot/MRS
pound/DGRSZ
precise/NPVXY
precurse/V
predefinite/NX
presage/DGRS
presentationist/A
preserved/U
press/DGJRSV
pretechnical/Y
procreate/NV
prorogate/N
prosaical/PY
proved/AU
pull/DGJNRS
puma/M
pure/DPRTY
quantify/DGNRSXZ
quieten/DGRS
quizzical/PY
quo/H
ra/HS
rail/DGRSYZ
ravin/D
re/DGJSTVY
reason/DGJRS
reawaken/DGS
receiving/U
redd/GNRT
refrigerate/DGNV
refuse/DGNRSV
registrate/NX
require/DGRS
requit/DGR
rerun/S
resolute/NPVXY
respectless/PY
restrict/DGSV
resuscitate/DGNSV
retroperitoneal/Y
revise/DGNRSX
ridden/U
ride/GJRSZ
rig/MS
rise/GJRSZ
rude/PRTY
runs/A
satiated/IU
savage/DGPRSYZ
scar/DGHMRS
schedule/DGMRSZ
screen/DGJRS
scrutinizingly/S
seam/DGNRS
seclusive/PY
segregate/DGNPSV
semiconscious/PY
sensate/NXY
sentience/AI
sequence/DGJRSZ
setting/AIU
seventeen/HS
shadowed/U
she/DHMRV
shingle/DGMRS
shoot/GJRSZ
should/RTZ
shy/DGRSTY
sixteen/HRS
sizzle/DGR
slubber/GRY
smatter/GJR
snappy/PRT
snipe/DGRSZ
snug/PSY
solo/DGHMS
solubleness/AI
sortilege/R
sottish/PY
spatiate/N
speculate/DGNSVX
spirant/I
splice/DGJRSZ
splinted/U
sporty/PRT
stake/DGRS
standardizes/A
state/DGMNRSVXY
steal/DGHRS
stomach/DGRS
stormy/PRT
stream/DGMRSZ
strew/GHRS
strip/DGMRS
stroke/DGRSZ
subproof/MS
substitute/DGNRSVX
sudoriferous/P
supportably/IU
surmised/Y
suspended/AU
suspense/NSVXY
swathe/DGJRS
sweer/D
swift/NPRTY
switched/U
tall/PRT
te/DGHT
teem/DGRS
teletype/GMRS
tendance/I
th/GJN
theorize/DGRSZ
there/MPS
thermo/S
thirty/HS
thundrous/Y
tolerating/I
tomfoolish/P
tort/AIV
tour/DGRS
tractability/AIU
traversable/IU
tricky/PRT
trounce/DGRS
trunked/U
tunnel/DGJRSYZ
twenty/HS
type/DGMRS
ultimate/NPY
unbrave/DY
unclothed/PY
underestimate/DGNSX
understate/DGS
unfeigning/PY
unfester/D
unify/DGNRSXZ
uninterruptible/P
unit/DGMRSV
unpaper/D
unrivet/DG
unsacramental/Y
unsuggestive/P
untame/DPY
utensil/MS
utilization/A
validating/IU
verify/DGNRSXZ
vertible/AI
vituperative/Y
Volapuk/R
volute/ADIN
vote/DGRSVZ
w/DGJNRTV
warm/DGHPRSTYZ
waste/DGPRSZ
water/DGJMRS
wee/DP
whirl/DGRS
wind/DGRSZ
withhold/GJRSZ
wool/DNRSXY
would/T
woven/AIU
wriggled/U
xyst/R
year/HMSY
yer/H
